North Carolina, session 2025, HB248.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this act, the following definitions
apply:
(1) Home business use. – An accessory commercial or professional activity
conducted by the owner-occupant within the dwelling that is incidental to the
primary residential use. To qualify as a "home business use," the business
must be operated directly by the owner-occupant and not leased or rented to a
third party.
(2) Live/work unit. – Under the North Carolina State Building Code, a dwelling
unit in which more than ten percent (10%) and less than fifty percent (50%)
of the space includes a nonresidential use that is operated by the tenant.
(3) Owner-occupied. – A dwelling that serves as the primary residence of at least
one record owner of the property. For purposes of this act, the owner must
physically reside in the dwelling. Temporary absences, such as military
deployment or seasonal travel, do not negate owner-occupancy so long as the
owner intends to return and no other person assumes primary occupancy.
(4) Single-family dwelling. – A residential building that contains only one
dwelling unit intended for occupancy by a single family or household and is
subject to the North Carolina Residential Code.
SECTION 1.(b) Classification and Exemption. – An owner-occupied, single-family
dwelling with a home business use, as defined in subsection (a) of this section, shall be subject
solely to the same provisions of the North Carolina State Building Code that would apply if the
dwelling had no home business use, subject to the conditions of subsection (c) of this section.
Notwithstanding any provision of law or code to the contrary, the presence of a home business
use shall not:
(1) Alter the dwelling's classification as a single-family residence subject to the
North Carolina Residential Code for One- and Two-family dwellings;
(2) Cause any portion of the dwelling to be considered a separate occupancy or
trigger live/work, mixed-use, or commercial requirements under the North
Carolina Building Code; or
*H248-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Impose any additional requirements under the North Carolina State Building
Code that would not otherwise apply to a single-family dwelling.
All other applicable requirements under the North Carolina Residential Code for a
single-family dwelling remain in effect.
SECTION 1.(c) Conditions for Exemption. – A dwelling qualifies for the exemption
under subsection (b) of this section only if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) Owner-occupancy. – The dwelling is occupied by the business owner as the
owner's primary residence.
(2) Home business use. – The activity conducted in the area of the dwelling used
for business meets the definition of "home business use" as defined in
subsection (a) of this section.
(3) Local zoning compliance. – The home business use of the dwelling is
permitted under applicable local zoning law and is otherwise lawful.
SECTION 1.(d) Loss of Exemption. – If at any time the dwelling ceases to meet any
condition of subsection (c) of this section, the exemption provided by subsection (b) of this
section shall automatically terminate. Upon the termination of the exemption, the dwelling shall
thereafter be subject to any applicable occupancy classification and associated requirements of
the North Carolina State Building Code.
SECTION 2.(a) Prohibition on Reclassification and Change of Occupancy. –
Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-1115 or any other law, a dwelling exempt under Section 1 of this act
shall not be reclassified as a live/work unit, commercial occupancy, or mixed occupancy solely
because of the presence of a home business use, and no reinspection or reissuance of a certificate
of occupancy shall be required solely on that basis.
SECTION 2.(b) Preemption of Local Ordinances. – No county or municipality shall
enact or enforce any ordinance, rule, or policy that:
(1) Requires an owner-occupied, single-family dwelling meeting the exemption
requirements of Section 1(b) of this act to be classified or regulated under the
commercial or live/work provisions of the North Carolina Building Code; or
(2) Imposes any construction, fire-safety, or structural requirement more stringent
than, or in addition to, those specified by the North Carolina Residential Code
for single-family dwellings, solely because the dwelling is used for a home
business use meeting the requirements of Section 1(b) of this act.
SECTION 2.(c) To implement the provisions of this act, the following shall apply:
(1) The North Carolina Building Code Council shall adopt permanent rules to
amend the applicable provisions of the North Carolina State Building Code in
a manner consistent with the provisions of Section 1 of this act.
(2) The North Carolina Residential Code Council shall adopt permanent rules to
amend the applicable provisions of the North Carolina Residential Code in a
manner consistent with the provisions of Section 1 of this act.
(3) Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-19(4), the rules adopted pursuant to this section
shall be substantively identical to the provisions of Section 1 of this act and
shall become effective as provided in G.S. 150B-21.3(b)(1), as though 10 or
more written objections had been received in accordance with
G.S. 150B-21.3(b)(2).
(4) Rules adopted under this section shall not be subject to review under Part 3 of
Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
SECTION 2.(d) Sunset. – Section 1 of this act shall expire on the date that permanent
rules adopted by the North Carolina Building Code Council and North Carolina Residential Code
Council under subsection (c) of this section become effective.
SECTION 2.(e) Exceptions and Limitations. – The provisions of this section are
subject to the following exceptions and clarification:
Page 2 House Bill 248-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Local zoning and police powers. – Nothing in this act shall be construed to
limit or modify the authority of a county or municipality to regulate land use
or to prohibit or restrict particular business activities under its zoning or police
powers, including, but not limited to, adult establishments as defined in
G.S. 14-202.10, uses involving highly flammable materials, or other
operations deemed unlawful or hazardous under State or federal law.
(2) Private covenants not superseded. – This act does not supersede any valid
private covenant, deed restriction, or homeowners' association bylaw that
prohibits or limits home-based businesses. Property owners remain subject to
any private land-use restrictions that apply to their property, and nothing in
this section shall be construed to alter or invalidate such private agreements.
(3) Compliance with other laws. – A home-based business shall comply with all
applicable State and federal laws, rules, and regulations, including health and
safety laws, occupational licensing requirements, and environmental
standards. Nothing in this act shall be construed to exempt a home-based
business from any State or federal permit, license, or approval requirement.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act is effective when it becomes law and applies
to all existing owner-occupied, single-family dwellings and to all owner-occupied, single-family
dwellings constructed, renovated, or used for home business use on or after that date.
House Bill 248-First Edition Page 3